Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB198.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of providing the General Assembly the authority to
exempt all or a portion of any class of property from taxation or eliminate all or a portion
of any state or local property tax and the related provisions of that tax by amending the
Constitution of Kentucky to read as stated below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 170 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
There shall be exempt from taxation public property used for public purposes;
places of burial not held for private or corporate profit; real property owned and occupied
by, and personal property both tangible and intangible owned by, institutions of religion;
institutions of purely public charity, and institutions of education not used or employed
for gain by any person or corporation, and the income of which is devoted solely to the
cause of education, public libraries, their endowments, and the income of such property
as is used exclusively for their maintenance; household goods of a person used in his
home; crops grown in the year in which the assessment is made, and in the hands of the
producer; and real property maintained as the permanent residence of the owner, who is
sixty-five years of age or older, or is classified as totally disabled under a program
authorized or administered by an agency of the United States government or by any
retirement system either within or without the Commonwealth of Kentucky, provided the
property owner received disability payments pursuant to such disability classification, has
maintained such disability classification for the entirety of the particular taxation period,
and has filed with the appropriate local assessor by December 31 of the taxation period,
on forms provided therefor, a signed statement indicating continuing disability as
provided herein made under penalty of perjury, up to the assessed valuation of sixty-five
hundred dollars on said residence and contiguous real property, except for assessment for
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/8/2025 4:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1142
special benefits. The real property may be held by legal or equitable title, by the
entireties, jointly, in common, as a condominium, or indirectly by the stock ownership or
membership representing the owner's or member's proprietary interest in a corporation
owning a fee or a leasehold initially in excess of ninety-eight years. The exemptions shall
apply only to the value of the real property assessable to the owner or, in case of
ownership through stock or membership in a corporation, the value of the proportion
which his interest in the corporation bears to the assessed value of the property. The
General Assembly may authorize any incorporated city or town to exempt manufacturing
establishments from municipal taxation, for a period not exceeding five years, as an
inducement to their location. Notwithstanding any provision of[the provisions of
Sections 3, 172, and 174 of] this Constitution to the contrary, the General Assembly may,
through the passage of general laws, exempt all or a portion of any class of property
from taxation by reducing or eliminating the tax rate applicable to the class of property
or the value of the property assessed for taxation. The General Assembly may, through
the passage of general laws, eliminate all or a portion of any state or local property tax
and the related provisions of that tax[ provide by law an exemption for all or any portion
of the property tax for any class of personal property].
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and under Sections 4
and 5 of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/8/2025 4:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1142
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, not
later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August preceding the next
regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be chosen in a year in
which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the United States, or not
later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September preceding a regular election
in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United
States, the Secretary of State shall certify the complete text of Section 1 of this Act and
the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in
Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk shall have
the entirety of the text and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on the ballots
provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting machines in
use in each county or precinct.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/8/2025 4:42 PM Jacketed